Mississippi statutes. Title 53. Oil, Gas, and Other Minerals
Mississippi Surface Coal Mining and Reclamation Law

§ 53-9-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Mississippi Surface Coal Mining and Reclamation Law.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 53-9-3.
Legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature finds and declares that:

The State of Mississippi, instead of the federal government, should regulate surface coal mining in this state because the terrain, climate, biologic, chemical and other physical conditions of the state differ from those of other states subject to regulation of mining operations;

Extraction of coal from the earth can be accomplished by various methods of mining, including surface mining;

Coal mining operations presently contribute significantly to the energy requirements of the state and nation, and surface coal mining constitutes one (1) method of extraction of the resource;

Many surface mining operations result in disturbances of surface areas that burden and adversely affect commerce and the public welfare by destroying or diminishing the utility of land for commercial, industrial, residential, recreational, agricultural and forestry purposes, by causing erosion and landslides, by contributing to floods, by polluting water, by destroying fish and wildlife habitats, by impairing natural beauty, by damaging the property of citizens, by creating hazards dangerous to life and property, by degrading the quality of life in local communities, and by counteracting governmental programs and efforts to conserve soil, water and other natural resources;

The expansion of coal mining to meet the energy needs of the state and nation makes even more urgent the establishment of appropriate standards to minimize damage to the environment and to productivity of the soil and to protect the health and safety of the public;

Surface mining and reclamation technology are now developed so that effective and reasonable regulation of surface coal mining operations by the state in accordance with the requirements of this chapter is an appropriate and necessary means to minimize, so far as practicable, the adverse social, economic and environmental effects of those mining operations;

Surface mining and reclamation standards are essential to insure the ability of the state to improve and maintain adequate standards on coal mining operations within its borders;

The impacts from unreclaimed land disturbed by surface coal mining operations impose social and economic costs on residents in nearby and adjoining areas, as well as impair environmental quality;

Surface coal mining operations contribute to the economic well-being, security and general welfare of the state and nation and should be conducted in an environmentally sound manner;

This chapter is necessary to prevent or mitigate adverse environmental effects of surface coal mining operations; and

The provisions of the 2001 amendments to this chapter are to provide for and implement a state program for abandoned mine reclamation which complies with the provisions of Subchapter IV of the federal Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977, 30 USCS 1231 through 1243.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 4; Laws, 2001, ch. 426, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 53-9-5.
Purpose.

It is the purpose of this chapter:

To assume for the state exclusive jurisdiction over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within the state under Section 503 of the federal act;

To develop, implement and enforce a program which, at a minimum, will achieve the purposes of the federal act and the regulations promulgated under that act;

To assure that the rights of surface landowners and other persons with a legal interest in the land or appurtenances thereto are fully protected from those operations;

To assure that surface coal mining operations are not conducted where reclamation as required by this chapter is not feasible;

To assure that surface coal mining operations are conducted in a manner protective of the environment;

To assure that adequate procedures are undertaken to reclaim surface areas as contemporaneously as possible with the surface coal mining operations;

To assure that appropriate procedures are provided for public participation in the development, revision and enforcement of regulations, standards, reclamation plans or programs established by the state under this chapter;

To assure that the coal supply essential to the energy requirements of the state and nation and to their economic and social well-being is provided, and to strike a balance between protection of the environment and agricultural productivity and the need of the state and nation for coal as an essential source of energy; and

To, wherever necessary, exercise the full reach of state constitutional powers to insure the protection of the public interest through effective control of surface coal mining operations.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 3; Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

§ 53-9-7.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall have the meaning ascribed in this section unless the context requires otherwise:

“Abandoned mine lands” means lands and waters affected by the mining or processing of coal before August 3, 1977, or affected by the mining or processing of noncoal minerals, including, but not limited to, sand, gravel, clay and soil, before August 3, 1977, and abandoned or left in either an unreclaimed or inadequately reclaimed condition, and for which there is no continuing reclamation responsibility required under state or federal law, and which continue in the present condition substantially to degrade the quality of the environment, to prevent or damage the beneficial use of land or water resources, or to endanger the health or safety of the public. Abandoned mine lands also means those lands and waters described by 30 USC 1232(g)(4), 30 USC 1233(b)(1) and 30 USC 1239.

“Appeal” means an appeal to an appropriate court of the state taken from a final decision of the Permit Board or commission made after a formal hearing before that body.

“Approximate original contour” means that surface configuration achieved by backfilling and grading of the mined area so that the reclaimed area, including any terracing or access roads, closely resembles the general surface configuration of the land before mining and blends into and complements the drainage pattern of the surrounding terrain, with all highwalls and spoil piles eliminated. Water impoundments may be allowed if the Permit Board determines that the impoundments are in compliance with Section 53-9-45(2)(g).

“As recorded in the minutes of the Permit Board” means the date of the Permit Board meeting at which the action concerned is taken by the Permit Board.

“Coal” means combustible carbonaceous rock, classified as anthracite, bituminous, subbituminous, or lignite by the American Society of Testing and Materials.

“Commission” means the Mississippi Commission on Environmental Quality.

“Department” means the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality.

“Executive director” means the executive director of the department.

“Exploration operations” means the disturbance of the surface or subsurface before surface coal mining and reclamation operations begin for the purpose of determining the location, quantity or quality of a coal deposit, and the gathering of environmental data to establish the conditions of the area before the beginning of surface coal mining and reclamation operations.

“Federal act” means the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977, as amended, which is codified as Section 1201 et seq. of Title 30 of the United States Code.

“Formal hearing” means a hearing on the record, as recorded and transcribed by a court reporter, before the commission or Permit Board where all parties to the hearing are allowed to present witnesses, cross-examine witnesses and present evidence for inclusion into the record, as appropriate under rules promulgated by the commission or Permit Board.

“Imminent danger to health and safety of the public” means the existence of any condition or practice, or any violation of a permit or other requirement of this chapter, in a surface coal mining and reclamation operation, which could reasonably be expected to cause substantial physical harm to persons outside the permit area before that condition, practice or violation can be abated. A reasonable expectation of death or serious injury before abatement exists if a rational person subjected to the same conditions or practices giving rise to the peril would not expose himself or herself to the danger during the time necessary for abatement.

“Interested party” means any person claiming an interest relating to the surface coal mining operation and who is so situated that the person may be affected by that operation, or in the matter of regulations promulgated by the commission, any person who is so situated that the person may be affected by the action.

“Lignite” means consolidated lignite coal having less than eight thousand three hundred (8,300) British thermal units per pound, moist and mineral matter free.

“Operator” means any person engaged in coal mining who removes or intends to remove more than two hundred fifty (250) tons of coal from the earth by coal mining within twelve (12) consecutive calendar months in any one (1) location.

“Permit” means a permit to conduct surface coal mining and reclamation operations issued under this chapter.

“Permit area” means the area of land indicated on the approved map submitted by the operator with the permit application which area of land shall be covered by the operator’s performance bond.

“Permit Board” means the Permit Board created under Section 49-17-28.

“Person” means an individual, partnership, association, society, joint venture, joint-stock company, firm, company, corporation, cooperative or other business organization and any agency, unit or instrumentality of federal, state or local government, including any publicly owned utility or publicly owned corporation.

“Prime farmland” means that farmland as defined by the United States Secretary of Agriculture on the basis of factors such as moisture availability, temperature regime, chemical balance, permeability, surface layer composition, susceptibility to flooding and erosion characteristics, and which historically have been used for intensive agricultural purposes, and as published in the federal register.

“Public hearing,” “informal hearing” or “public meeting” means a public forum organized by the commission, department or Permit Board for the purpose of providing information to the public regarding a surface coal mining and reclamation operation or regulations proposed by the commission and at which members of the public are allowed to make comments or ask questions or both of the commission, department or the Permit Board.

“Reclamation plan” means a plan submitted by an applicant for a permit which sets forth a plan for reclamation of the proposed surface coal mining operations under this chapter.

“Revision” means any change to the permit or reclamation plan that does not significantly change the effect of the mining operation on either those persons impacted by the permitted operations or on the environment, including, but not limited to, incidental boundary changes to the permit area or a departure from or change within the permit area, incidental changes in the mining method or incidental changes in the reclamation plan.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of the United States Department of Interior.

“State” means the State of Mississippi.

“State geologist” means the head of the Office of Geology and Energy Resources of the department or a successor office.

“State reclamation program” means the Mississippi program for abandoned mine reclamation provided for in this chapter.

“Surface coal mining and reclamation operations” means surface coal mining operations and all activities necessary and incident to the reclamation of those operations.

“Surface coal mining operations” means:

Activities conducted on the surface and immediate subsurface of lands in connection with a surface coal mine, surface operations and surface impacts incident to an underground coal mine, the products of which enter commerce or the operations of which directly or indirectly affect commerce. These activities include, but are not limited to:

Excavation for the purpose of obtaining coal including common methods such as contour, strip, auger, mountaintop removal, boxcut, open pit and area mining;

The use of explosives and blasting, in situ distillation or retorting, leaching or other chemical or physical processing; and

The cleaning, concentrating or other processing or preparation, and the loading of coal for commerce at or near the mine site.

Areas upon which the activities occur or where the activities disturb the natural land surface. These areas shall also include, but are not limited to:

Any adjacent land the use of which is incidental to any activities;

All lands affected by the construction of new roads or the improvement or use of existing roads to gain access to the site of any activities and for haulage;

All lands affected by excavations, workings, impoundments, dams, ventilation shafts, entryways, refuse banks, dumps, stockpiles, overburden piles, spoil banks, culm banks, tailings, holes or depressions, repair areas, storage areas, processing areas, shipping areas and other areas upon which are sited structures, facilities or other property or materials on the surface resulting from or incident to the activities.

These activities do not include exploration operations subject to Section 53-9-41.

“Unwarranted failure to comply” means the failure of a permittee to prevent or abate the occurrence of any violation of a permit, this chapter or any regulation promulgated under this chapter due to indifference, lack of diligence or lack of reasonable care.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 4; Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 6; Laws, 2001, ch. 426, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 343, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 25, 2008.).

§ 53-9-9.
Administration and enforcement of chapter.

The department is designated as the agency to administer this chapter. The commission is designated as the body to enforce this chapter, including, but not limited to, the issuance of penalty orders, promulgation of regulations regarding matters addressed in this chapter, and designation of lands unsuitable for surface coal mining. The permit board is designated as the body to issue, modify, revoke, transfer, suspend and reissue permits and to require, modify or release performance bonds under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 5; Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

§ 53-9-11.
Promulgation of rules and regulations; hearings; notice thereof.

The commission may adopt, modify, repeal and promulgate, after due notice and hearing and in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, and where not otherwise prohibited by federal or state law, may make exceptions to and grant exemptions and variances from and may enforce rules and regulations necessary or appropriate to carry out this chapter. Those rules and regulations shall be consistent with rules and regulations promulgated by the United States Secretary of the Interior under the federal act. No exceptions, exemptions or variances shall be less stringent than rules and regulations promulgated under the federal act. Any rules and regulations adopted by the commission may be more stringent than those promulgated by the United States Secretary of the Interior as long as they are not otherwise inconsistent with this chapter. A rule or regulation adopted by the commission may differ in its terms and provisions regarding particular conditions, particular mining techniques, particular areas of the state, or any other conditions that appear relevant and necessary as long as the action taken is consistent with this chapter. Before adopting any rules and regulations under this chapter, the commission shall hold a public hearing. Notice of the date, time, place and purpose of the hearing shall be given thirty (30) days before the scheduled date of the hearing as follows:

By mail:

To all operators known by the commission to be actively engaged in surface coal mining operations in the state;

To persons who make written request for notification of the proposed regulations;

To the Mississippi Soil and Water Conservation Commission, and to each local soil and water conservation district;

To the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, the Mississippi Forestry Commission, the Mississippi Department of Archives and History, the Mississippi Department of Transportation, the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce, the Mississippi State Oil and Gas Board, the Mississippi Department of Marine Resources, and the Mississippi State Department of Health; and

To any other state agency whose jurisdiction the commission feels the surface coal mining operations may affect;

To other interested parties by publication of the notice once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks in one (1) newspaper having general circulation in the state.

Any person may submit written comments or appear and offer oral comments at the public hearing. The commission shall consider all comments and relevant data presented at the public hearing before final adoption of rules and regulations under this chapter. The failure of any person to submit comments within a time period as established by the commission shall not preclude action by the commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 6; Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

§ 53-9-13.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 43, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

[Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 7]

§ 53-9-15.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 44, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

[Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 8]

§ 53-9-17.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 45, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

[Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 9]

§ 53-9-19.
Financial interest of persons employed under this chapter; penalty; monitoring and enforcement.

No employee of the department performing any function or duty under this chapter shall have a direct or indirect financial interest in any underground or surface coal mining operation. Whoever knowingly violates this subsection shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) or by imprisonment of not more than one (1) year, or by both.

The commission shall promulgate regulations to establish methods by which this section shall be monitored and enforced, including appropriate provisions for the filing by any employees and the review of statements and supplements thereto concerning any financial interest which may be affected by this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 10; Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

§ 53-9-21.
Surface coal mining and reclamation permit; term; extensions; use by successor in interest; termination.

No person shall open, develop, engage in, carry out or continue on lands within the state any new or existing surface coal mining operations without a permit issued by the permit board.

All permits issued under this chapter shall be issued for a term not to exceed five (5) years, unless the applicant demonstrates that a specified longer term is reasonably needed to allow the applicant to obtain necessary financing for equipment and the opening of the operation. If the application is complete for the specified longer term, the permit board may issue a permit for the longer term.

A successor in interest to a permittee who applies for a new permit within thirty (30) days of succeeding to that interest, and who is able to obtain the bond coverage of the original permittee, may continue surface coal mining and reclamation operations according to the approved mining and reclamation plan of the original permittee until the permit board takes action on the successor’s application.

A permit shall be terminated if the permittee has not commenced the surface coal mining operations covered by that permit within three (3) years after the issuance of the permit. The permit board may grant reasonable extensions of time upon a showing that the extensions are necessary by reason of litigation precluding the commencement of surface coal mining operations or threatening substantial economic loss to the permittee upon or after commencement, or by reason of conditions beyond the control and without the fault or negligence of the permittee. For coal mined for use in a synthetic fuel facility or specific major electric generating facility, the permittee shall be deemed to have commenced surface coal mining operations at the time construction of the synthetic fuel or generating facility is initiated.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 11(1)-(4); Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

§ 53-9-23.
Surface coal mining and reclamation permit-reissuance.

Any permit shall have the right of successive reissuance upon expiration for the areas within the boundaries of the existing permit. The burden of proving that the permit should not be reissued shall be on opponents of reissuance or the department. The holders of the permit may apply for reissuance and after meeting the public notice requirements of Sections 53-9-37 and 53-9-39, that permit shall be reissued unless it is established by the opponents to reissuance or the department, and written findings are made by the permit board stating that:

The permittee is not satisfactorily meeting the terms and conditions of the existing permit;

The surface coal mining and reclamation operation is not in compliance with the environmental protection standards of this chapter and the regulations applicable to the existing permit;

The reissuance requested substantially jeopardizes the operator’s continuing responsibility on existing permit areas;

The operator has not provided evidence that the performance bond, or any additional bond the permit board may require under Section 53-9-31, which is in effect for that operation, will continue in full force and effect for any period of reissuance requested in the application; or

The operator has failed to provide any additional, revised or updated information required by the department or the permit board.

Before granting the reissuance of any permit, the permit board shall provide notice to the public authorities described in Section 53-9-39(1)(b).

If an application for reissuance of a permit includes a proposal to extend the surface coal mining operation beyond the boundaries authorized in the existing permit, the portion of the application for reissuance of the permit which addresses any new land areas shall be subject to the requirements applicable to new applications under this chapter.

Any permit reissuance shall be for a term not to exceed the period of the original permit established by this chapter. Application for permit reissuance shall be filed at least one hundred eighty (180) days before the expiration of the permit. If an application for reissuance is timely filed, the operator may continue surface coal mining operations under the existing permit until the permit board takes action on the reissuance application.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 11(5); Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

§ 53-9-25.
Surface coal mining and reclamation permit; application fee; contents of application; insurance coverage; blasting plan; notice of past violations.

Each application for a permit shall be submitted in a manner satisfactory to the permit board and shall contain:

Information about the owners of all interests in the property to be mined, the owners of record of all surface and subsurface areas adjacent to any part of the permit area, the applicant and the operator, the organization of and business of the applicant, including, but not limited to, information regarding the ownership and names and addresses of directors, partners, officers and resident agents, the previous experience and performance history of the applicant in surface coal mining; a statement of whether the applicant, subsidiary, affiliate or persons controlled by or under common control with the applicant has held a mining permit which in the five-year period before the initial filing of this application has been suspended or revoked or under which the performance bond or deposit has been forfeited; a description of the proposed mining operation, including maps or plans, the watershed into which surface and pit drainage will be discharged, significant climatological factors and soil surveys; and any other information as the permit board or commission by regulation may require consistent with the federal act.

A determination of the probable hydrologic consequences of the surface coal mining and reclamation operations, both on and off the mine site, with respect to the hydrologic regime, quantity and quality of water in surface and ground water systems. The determination shall include, but not be limited to, an estimate of the dissolved and suspended solids under seasonal flow conditions, and the collection of sufficient data from the mine site and surrounding areas so that an assessment can be made by the permit board of the probable cumulative impacts of all anticipated mining in the area upon the hydrology of the area and particularly upon water availability. This determination shall not be required until hydrologic information on the general area before mining is made available from an appropriate federal or state agency, but the permit shall not be issued until that information is available and is incorporated into the application; and

A statement of the result of test borings or core samplings from the permit area. The statement shall include, but not be limited to, logs of the drill holes, the thickness of the coal seam found, an analysis of the chemical properties of the coal, the sulphur content of any coal seam, chemical analysis of potentially acid or toxic forming sections of the overburden, and a chemical analysis of the stratum lying immediately underneath the coal to be mined. This paragraph may be waived by the permit board with respect to the specific application by a written determination that the requirements are unnecessary.

In addition to the information required by the permit board under subsection (1) of this section, each applicant for a permit shall submit to the permit board as part of the permit application the following:

A reclamation plan which meets the requirements of this chapter and regulations promulgated under this chapter;

A certificate issued by an insurance company authorized to do business in the United States certifying that the applicant has a public liability insurance policy in force for the surface coal mining and reclamation operations for which the permit is sought, or in the alternative, evidence that the applicant has satisfied other state or federal self-insurance requirements. Any policy shall provide for personal injury and property damage protection in an amount determined by the permit board to be adequate to compensate any persons damaged as a result of surface coal mining and reclamation operations, including use of explosives, and entitled to compensation under applicable state law. The policy shall be maintained in full force and effect during the term of the permit and any reissuance, including the length of all reclamation operations.

A blasting plan which outlines the procedures and standards by which the operator will meet the regulations promulgated under this chapter.

The applicant shall file with the permit application a list showing any administrative order or notice of violation issued under this chapter, or any law of any state or the United States, or any rule or regulation of any department or agency of any state or the United States, related to air or water environmental protection incurred by the applicant in connection with any surface coal mining operation during the three-year period immediately preceding the filing date of the initial application. The list shall also indicate the final resolution of any notice of violation or administrative order. If the list or other information available to the permit board indicates that any surface coal mining operation owned or controlled by the applicant is currently in violation of this chapter or any other laws referred to in this subsection, the permit shall not be issued until the applicant submits proof that the violation has been corrected or is in the process of being corrected to the satisfaction of the department or agency of any state or the United States which has jurisdiction over the violation. No permit shall be issued to an applicant following a finding by the permit board, after opportunity for a formal hearing, that the applicant, or the operator specified in the application, controls or has controlled mining operations with a demonstrated pattern of willful violations of any law, rule or regulation of any state or the United States, or any department or agency of any state or the United States, related to air or water environmental protection in connection with any surface coal mining operation and which is of a nature and duration with resulting irreparable damage to the environment to indicate an intent not to comply with this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 12(1)-(5), (7), (8); Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

§ 53-9-26.
Surface coal mining and reclamation permit; application cost assistance to small operators.

If the Permit Board finds that the probable total annual production at all locations of a surface coal mining operator will not exceed three hundred thousand (300,000) tons, the cost of conducting activities to obtain and provide the information required to be contained in the permit application as determined by the commission consistent with Section 507(c) of the federal act shall be assumed by the department, subject to the availability of federal or other special funds for that purpose and upon written request of the operator. All work under this section shall be performed by a qualified public or private laboratory or other public or private qualified entity designated by the department.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 373, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 16, 1998).

§ 53-9-27.
Filing of permit application with chancery court clerk; public inspection; exclusion of confidential information.

Each applicant for a permit shall file, within ten (10) days after filing with the permit board, a copy of its application for public inspection with the clerk of the chancery court of the county or judicial district where the mining is to occur and where real property contiguous to the surface coal mining and reclamation operation is located, if that property is located in more than one (1) county or judicial district. The applicant may omit from its filing information in its permit application pertaining to the quality, depth or width of the coal seam or the location of the coal seam within the permit area included in the application, if that information has been determined to be confidential by the commission under Section 53-9-43.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 12(6); Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

§ 53-9-28.
Surface coal mining and reclamation permit; permit fees.

The commission shall assess and collect a permit fee for reviewing the permit application and administering and enforcing a surface coal mining and reclamation permit. The commission may set permit fees for the transfer, modification or reissuance of a surface coal mining and reclamation permit.

The commission may also establish a permit fee for the issuance, reissuance, transfer or modification of a coal exploration permit and a reasonable fee for a copy of a transcript of a formal hearing held under this chapter.

The commission shall set by order the amount of any permit fee assessed under this section. A permit fee may be less than, but shall not exceed the actual or anticipated direct and indirect costs of reviewing the permit application and administering and enforcing the permit. The commission may establish procedures to allow the assessment and collection of the permit fee over the term of the permit.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

§ 53-9-29.
Reclamation plan included in application; contents.

The reclamation plan shall include in the degree of detail as the commission may require by regulation:

An identification of lands subject to surface coal mining operations over the estimated life of those operations;

Information about the condition and variety of uses of the land at the time of the application and the proposed uses of the land after reclamation;

A description of how reclamation is to be achieved, including a schedule of and timetable for significant reclamation activities;

An estimate of reclamation costs;

The steps to be taken to comply with applicable air and water quality standards, health and safety standards and performance standards applicable to reclamation adopted under this chapter; and

Any other information consistent with the federal act as the permit board or commission may require to demonstrate that the reclamation required by this chapter can be accomplished.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 13; Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

§ 53-9-31.
Surface coal mining and reclamation permit; filing, deposit, and adjustment of bond; requirement of surety; liability under bond.

The applicant shall file with the department, in the manner and form as required by the commission, a bond for performance payable to the commission and conditional upon faithful performance of the requirements of this chapter and the permit. The bond shall be filed before the issuance of a permit. The bond shall cover that area of land within the permit area upon which the operator will initiate and conduct surface coal mining and reclamation operations within the initial term of the permit. The permit area shall be readily identifiable by appropriate marks on the site. As succeeding increments of surface coal mining and reclamation operations are to be initiated and conducted within the permit area, the permittee shall file with the department an additional bond or bonds to cover those increments in accordance with this section. The amount of the bond required for each bonded area shall depend upon the reclamation requirements of the permit and shall reflect the probable difficulty of reclamation, giving consideration to factors such as topography, geology of the site, hydrology and revegetation potential. The amount of the bond shall be determined by the permit board after consultation with the state geologist. The amount of the bond shall be sufficient to assure the completion of the reclamation plan if the work had to be performed by the department in the event of forfeiture, and in no case shall the bond for the entire area under one (1) permit be less than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00).

Liability under the bond shall be for the duration of the surface coal mining and reclamation operation and for a period which coincides with the operator’s responsibility for revegetation requirements in regulations promulgated under Section 53-9-45. The bond shall be executed by the operator and a corporate surety licensed to do business in this state. The operator may elect to deposit the following in lieu of the surety bond: cash, negotiable bonds of the United States government or the state, or negotiable certificates of deposit or a letter of credit of any bank organized or transacting business in the state and insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation or a similar federal banking or savings and loan insurance organization. The cash deposit or market value of the securities shall be equal to or greater than the amount of the bond required for the bonded area.

In accordance with any conditions established by the commission in regulations promulgated under this chapter, the permit board may accept the bond of the applicant itself without separate surety if the applicant demonstrates to the satisfaction of the permit board the existence of a suitable agent to receive service of process, a history of financial solvency and continuous operation sufficient for authorization to self-insure or bond that amount.

Cash, negotiable bonds, negotiable certificates of deposit, letters of credit or securities deposited as provided in subsection (2) of this section shall be deposited on the same terms upon which surety bonds may be deposited.

The amount of the financial assurance required and the terms of each acceptance of the applicant’s financial assurance shall be adjusted by the permit board from time to time as affected land acreages are increased or decreased or where the cost of future reclamation changes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 14; Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

§ 53-9-32.
Surface coal mining and reclamation permit; preparation of plain language summary of proposed operation and reclamation.

Upon receipt of a complete application for a surface coal mining and reclamation operation, the state geologist shall prepare a brief written summary of the proposed operation and reclamation. This summary shall be written in language understandable to the general public and shall be made available to the public at the department and at each location where the applicant is required to place a copy of the application for public inspection.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 1997).